Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4405
Foreign risk retention groups; requirements.

Risk retention groups chartered and licensed in states other than this state and seeking to do business as a risk retention group in this state shall observe and abide by the laws of this state as follows:

(1) Before offering insurance in this state, a risk retention group shall submit to the director:

(a) A statement identifying the state or states in which the risk retention group is chartered and licensed as a liability insurance company, the date of chartering and licensing, its principal place of business, and such other information, including information on its membership, as the director may require to verify that the risk retention group is qualified under subdivision (13) of section 44-4403. The identity and location of specific group members shall not be considered public record, except that such information may be provided to other state, federal, foreign, and international regulatory and law enforcement agencies and the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries if the recipient agrees in writing to maintain the confidentiality of the documents, material, or other information. The director may receive such information regarding the identity and location of specific group members from other state, federal, foreign, or international regulatory and law enforcement agencies and from the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries. The director shall maintain as confidential or privileged information received pursuant to this subdivision with notice or the understanding that it is confidential or privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the information. Such information shall not be a public record subject to disclosure by the director pursuant to sections 84-712 to 84-712.09, subject to subpoena, subject to discovery, or admissible in evidence in any private civil action, except that the director may use such information in any regulatory or legal action brought by the director. The director, and any other person while acting under the authority of the director who has received information pursuant to this subdivision, may not, and shall not be required to, testify in any private civil action concerning any information subject to this section. Nothing in this section shall constitute a waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality in the information received pursuant to this subdivision as a result of information sharing authorized by this section;

(b) A copy of its plan of operation or a feasibility study and revisions of such plan or study submitted to the state in which the risk retention group is chartered and licensed, except that the provision relating to the submission of a plan of operation or a feasibility study shall not apply with respect to any line or classification of liability insurance which (i) was defined in the federal Product Liability Risk Retention Act of 1981 before October 27, 1986, and (ii) was offered before such date by any risk retention group which had been chartered and licensed and operating for not less than three years before such date. The risk retention group shall submit a copy of any revision to its plan of operation or feasibility study required by subsection (2) of section 44-4404 at the same time that such revision is submitted to the state in which the risk retention group is chartered and licensed; and

(c) A statement of registration which designates the director as its agent for the purpose of receiving service of legal documents or process; and

(2) Any risk retention group doing business in this state shall submit to the director:

(a) A copy of the group's financial statement submitted to the state in which the risk retention group is chartered and licensed which shall be certified by an independent public accountant and contain a statement of opinion on loss and loss adjustment expense reserves made by a member of the American Academy of Actuaries or a qualified loss reserve specialist under criteria established by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners;

(b) A copy of each examination of the risk retention group as certified by the commissioner or public official conducting the examination;

(c) Upon request by the director, a copy of any audit performed with respect to the risk retention group; and

(d) Such information as may be required to verify its continuing qualification as a risk retention group under subdivision (13) of section 44-4403.

Laws 1987, LB 514, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 48;

Laws 2001, LB 52, § 48.